src/init-uppercase.regex
a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D, e (->) E, f (->) F, g (->) G,
h (->) H, i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N,
o (->) O, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R, s (->) S, t (->) T, u (->) U,
v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X, y (->) Y, z (->) Z, æ (->) Æ, ø (->) Ø, 
å (->) Å, á (->) Á, ä (->) Ä, ö (->) Ö, ñ (->) Ñ ,
á (->) Á, í (->) Í, ó (->) Ó, ú (->) Ú, ý (->) Ý, ð (->) Ð || .#. _ ;
